galician.aff
flag *K:                # "CAT=v,T=inf"   # Todos os tempos

G R E D I R > -EDIR,IDO  #"P=1,N=s,T=p"		# agredir->agrido
G R E D I R > -EDIR,IDES #"P=2,N=s,T=p"		# agredir->agrides
G R E D I R > -EDIR,IDE	 #"P=3,N=s,T=p"		# agredir->agride
G R E D I R > -R,MOS	 #"P=1,N=p,T=p"		# agredir->agredimos
G R E D I R > -R,DES	 #"P=2,N=p,T=p"		# agredir->agredides
G R E D I R > -EDIR,IDEN #"P=3,N=p,T=p"		# agredir->agriden
G R E D I R > -EDIR,IDA	 #"P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"	# agredir->agrida
G R E D I R > -EDIR,IDAS	#"P=2,N=s,T=ps"	# agredir->agridas
G R E D I R > -EDIR,IDAMOS	#"P=1,N=p,T=ps"	# agredir->agridamos
G R E D I R > -EDIR,IDADES	#"P=2,N=p,T=ps"	# agredir->agridades
G R E D I R > -EDIR,IDAN	#"P=3,N=p,T=ps"	# agredir->agridan

R I R > -R,O    	#"P=1,N=s,T=p"		# rir->rio
R I R > -R,S		#"P=2,N=s,T=p"		# rir->ris
R I R > -R,MOS		#"P=1,N=p,T=p"		# rir->rimos
R I R > -R,DES		#"P=2,N=p,T=p"		# rir->rides
R I R > -R,EN		#"P=3,N=p,T=p"		# rir->rien
R I R > -R,AMOS		#"P=1,N=p,T=ps"		# rir->riamos
R I R > -R,ADES		#"P=2,N=p,T=ps"		# rir->riades

D I C E R > -CER,GO    	#"P=1,N=s,T=p"		# dicer->digo
D I C E R > -CER,S	#"P=2,N=s,T=p"		# dicer->dis
D I C E R > -ICER,I	#"P=3,N=s,T=p"		# dicer->di
D I C E R > -R,MOS 	#"P=1,N=p,T=p"     	# dicer->dicemos
D I C E R > -R,DES    	#"P=2,N=p,T=p"     	# dicer->dicedes
D I C E R > -CER,N   	#"P=3,N=p,T=p"   	# dicer->din
D I C E R > -CER,XEN    #"P=1,N=s,T=pp"   	# dicer->dixen
D I C E R > -CER,XECHE  #"P=2,N=s,T=pp"   	# dicer->dixeche
D I C E R > -CER,XO     #"P=3,N=s,T=pp"   	# dicer->dixo
D I C E R > -CER,XEMOS  #"P=1,N=p,T=pp"   	# dicer->dixemos
D I C E R > -CER,XESTES #"P=2,N=p,T=pp"   	# dicer->dixestes
D I C E R > -CER,XERON  #"P=3,N=p,T=pp"   	# dicer->dixeron
D I C E R > -CER,REI   	#"P=1,N=s,T=f"    	# dicer->direi
D I C E R > -CER,RÁS   	#"P=2,N=s,T=f"    	# dicer->dirás
D I C E R > -CER,RÁ	#"P=3,N=s,T=f"    	# dicer->dirá
D I C E R > -CER,REMOS	#"P=1,N=p,T=f"    	# dicer->diremos
D I C E R > -CER,REDES 	#"P=2,N=p,T=f"    	# dicer->diredes
D I C E R > -CER,RÁN   	#"P=3,N=s,T=f"    	# dicer->dirán
D I C E R > -ER,IA   	#"P=1_3,N=s,T=pi"  	# dicer->dicia
D I C E R > -ER,IAS   	#"P=2,N=s,T=pi"    	# dicer->dicias
D I C E R > -ER,ÍAMOS 	#"P=1,N=p,T=pi"    	# dicer->dicíamos
D I C E R > -ER,ÍADES 	#"P=2,N=p,T=pi"    	# dicer->dicíades
D I C E R > -ER,IAN   	#"P=3,N=p,T=pi"    	# dicer->dician
D I C E R > -CER,XERA	#"P=1_3,N=s,T=pmp"	# dicer->dixera
D I C E R > -CER,XERAS	#"P=2,N=s,T=pmp" 	# dicer->dixeras
D I C E R > -CER,XÉRAMOS #"P=1,N=p,T=pmp" 	# dicer->dixéramos
D I C E R > -CER,XÉRADES #"P=2,N=p,T=pmp" 	# dicer->dixérades
D I C E R > -CER,XERAN	#"P=3,N=p,T=pmp" 	# dicer->dixeran
D I C E R > -CER,RIA	#"P=1_3,N=s,T=c"	# dicer->diria
D I C E R > -CER,RIAS	#"P=2,N=s,T=c"  	# dicer->dirias
D I C E R > -CER,RÍAMOS	#"P=1,N=p,T=c"  	# dicer->diríamos
D I C E R > -CER,RÍADES #"P=2,N=p,T=c"  	# dicer->diríades
D I C E R > -CER,RIAN	#"P=3,N=p,T=c" 		# dicer->dirian
D I C E R > -CER,GA   	#"P=1_3,N=s,T=ps" 	# dicer->diga
D I C E R > -CER,GAS   	#"P=2,N=s,T=ps"   	# dicer->digas
D I C E R > -CER,GAMOS 	#"P=1,N=p,T=ps"   	# dicer->digamos
D I C E R > -CER,GADES 	#"P=2,N=p,T=ps"   	# dicer->digades
D I C E R > -CER,GAN 	#"P=3,N=p,T=ps"   	# dicer->digan
D I C E R > -CER,XESE	#"P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"	# dicer->dixese
D I C E R > -CER,XESES	#"P=2,N=s,T=ps"  	# dicer->dixeses
D I C E R > -CER,XÉSEMOS #"P=1,N=p,T=ps"  	# dicer->dixésemos
D I C E R > -CER,XÉSEDES #"P=2,N=p,T=ps"  	# dicer->dixésedes
D I C E R > -CER,XESEN	#"P=3,N=p,T=ps"  	# dicer->dixesen
D I C E R > -CER,XER	#"P=1_3,N=s,T=fs" 	# dicer->dixer
D I C E R > -CER,XERES	#"P=1,N=s,T=fs"   	# dicer->dixeres
D I C E R > -CER,XERMOS #"P=1,N=p,T=fs"   	# dicer->dixermos
D I C E R > -CER,XERDES #"P=2,N=p,T=fs"   	# dicer->dixerdes
D I C E R > -CER,XEREN	#"P=3,N=p,T=fs"   	# dicer->dixeren
D I C E R > ES		#"P=2,N=s,T=ic"  	# dicer->diceres
D I C E R > MOS		#"P=1,N=p,T=ic"  	# dicer->dicermos
D I C E R > DES		#"P=2,N=p,T=ic"  	# dicer->dicerdes
D I C E R > EN		#"P=3,N=p,T=ic" 	# dicer->diceren
D I C E R > -R,NDO	#"T=g"			# dicer->dicendo
D I C E R > -CER,TO     #"G=m,N=s,T=ppa"	# dicer->dito
D I C E R > -CER,TA   	#"G=f,N=s,T=ppa"	# dicer->dita
D I C E R > -CER,TOS	#"G=m,N=p,T=ppa"	# dicer->ditos
D I C E R > -CER,TAS	#"G=f,N=p,T=ppa"	# dicer->ditas
D I C E R > -R,I	#"P=2,N=p,T=i"		# dicer->dicei
D I C E R > -ER,É				# dicer->dicé-(lo,la, etc.)

F A C E R > -CER,GO    	#"P=1,N=s,T=p"		# facer->fago
F A C E R > -CER,I	#"P=3,N=s,T=p"		# facer->fai
F A C E R > -R,MOS 	#"P=1,N=p,T=p"     	# facer->facemos
F A C E R > -R,DES    	#"P=2,N=p,T=p"     	# facer->facedes
F A C E R > -ACER,IXEN  #"P=1,N=s,T=pp"   	# facer->fixen
F A C E R > -ACER,IXECHE  #"P=2,N=s,T=pp"   	# facer->fixeche
F A C E R > -ACER,IXO     #"P=3,N=s,T=pp"   	# facer->fixo
F A C E R > -ACER,IXEMOS  #"P=1,N=p,T=pp"   	# facer->fixemos
F A C E R > -ACER,IXESTES #"P=2,N=p,T=pp"   	# facer->fixestes
F A C E R > -ACER,IXERON  #"P=3,N=p,T=pp"   	# facer->fixeron
F A C E R > -CER,REI   	#"P=1,N=s,T=f"    	# facer->farei
F A C E R > -CER,RÁS   	#"P=2,N=s,T=f"    	# facer->farás
F A C E R > -CER,RÁ	#"P=3,N=s,T=f"    	# facer->fará
F A C E R > -CER,REMOS	#"P=1,N=p,T=f"    	# facer->faremos
F A C E R > -CER,REDES 	#"P=2,N=p,T=f"    	# facer->faredes
F A C E R > -CER,RÁN   	#"P=3,N=s,T=f"    	# facer->farán
F A C E R > -ER,IA   	#"P=1_3,N=s,T=pi"  	# facer->facia
F A C E R > -ER,IAS   	#"P=2,N=s,T=pi"    	# facer->facias
F A C E R > -ER,ÍAMOS 	#"P=1,N=p,T=pi"    	# facer->facíamos
F A C E R > -ER,ÍADES 	#"P=2,N=p,T=pi"    	# facer->facíades
F A C E R > -ER,IAN   	#"P=3,N=p,T=pi"    	# facer->facian
F A C E R > -ACER,IXERA	   #"P=1_3,N=s,T=pmp"	# facer->fixera
F A C E R > -ACER,IXERAS   #"P=2,N=s,T=pmp" 	# facer->fixeras
F A C E R > -ACER,IXÉRAMOS #"P=1,N=p,T=pmp" 	# facer->fixéramos
F A C E R > -ACER,IXÉRADES #"P=2,N=p,T=pmp" 	# facer->fixérades
F A C E R > -ACER,IXERAN   #"P=3,N=p,T=pmp" 	# facer->fixeran
F A C E R > -CER,RIA	#"P=1_3,N=s,T=c"	# facer->faria
F A C E R > -CER,RIAS	#"P=2,N=s,T=c"  	# facer->farias
F A C E R > -CER,RÍAMOS	#"P=1,N=p,T=c"  	# facer->faríamos
F A C E R > -CER,RÍADES #"P=2,N=p,T=c"  	# facer->faríades
F A C E R > -CER,RIAN	#"P=3,N=p,T=c" 		# facer->farian
F A C E R > -CER,GA   	#"P=1_3,N=s,T=ps" 	# facer->faga
F A C E R > -CER,GAS   	#"P=2,N=s,T=ps"   	# facer->fagas
F A C E R > -CER,GAMOS 	#"P=1,N=p,T=ps"   	# facer->fagamos
F A C E R > -CER,GADES 	#"P=2,N=p,T=ps"   	# facer->fagades
F A C E R > -CER,GAN 	#"P=3,N=p,T=ps"   	# facer->fagan
F A C E R > -ACER,IXESE	   #"P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"	# facer->fixese
F A C E R > -ACER,IXESES   #"P=2,N=s,T=ps"  	# facer->fixeses
F A C E R > -ACER,IXÉSEMOS #"P=1,N=p,T=ps"  	# facer->fixésemos
F A C E R > -ACER,IXÉSEDES #"P=2,N=p,T=ps"  	# facer->fixésedes
F A C E R > -ACER,IXESEN   #"P=3,N=p,T=ps"  	# facer->fixesen
F A C E R > -ACER,IXER	   #"P=1_3,N=s,T=fs" 	# facer->fixer
F A C E R > -ACER,IXERES   #"P=1,N=s,T=fs"   	# facer->fixeres
F A C E R > -ACER,IXERMOS  #"P=1,N=p,T=fs"   	# facer->fixermos
F A C E R > -ACER,IXERDES  #"P=2,N=p,T=fs"   	# facer->fixerdes
F A C E R > -ACER,IXEREN   #"P=3,N=p,T=fs"   	# facer->fixeren
F A C E R > ES		   #"P=2,N=s,T=ic"  	# facer->faceres
F A C E R > MOS		#"P=1,N=p,T=ic"  	# facer->facermos
F A C E R > DES		#"P=2,N=p,T=ic"  	# facer->facerdes
F A C E R > EN		#"P=3,N=p,T=ic"  	# facer->faceren
F A C E R > -R,NDO	#"T=g"			# facer->facendo
F A C E R > -ACER,EITO  #"G=m,N=s,T=ppa"	# facer->feito
F A C E R > -ACER,EITA  #"G=f,N=s,T=ppa"	# facer->feita
F A C E R > -ACER,EITOS	#"G=m,N=p,T=ppa"	# facer->feitos
F A C E R > -ACER,EITAS	#"G=f,N=p,T=ppa"	# facer->feitas
F A C E R > -R,I	#"P=2,N=p,T=i"		# facer->facei
F A C E R > -ER,É	  			# facer->facé-(lo,la, etc.)

O R > -R,ÑO    		#"P=1,N=s,T=p"			# por->poño
O R > -OR,ÓS		#"P=2,N=s,T=p"			# repor->repós
O R > -R,MOS 		#"P=1,N=p,T=p"     		# por->pomos
O R > -R,NDES     	#"P=2,N=p,T=p"     		# por->pondes
O R > -R,ÑEN   		#"P=3,N=p,T=p"   		# por->poñen
O R > -OR,UXEN   	#"P=1,N=s,T=pp"    		# por->puxen
O R > -OR,UXECHE   	#"P=2,N=s,T=pp"    		# por->puxeche
O R > -OR,UXO   	#"P=3,N=s,T=pp"    		# por->puxo
O R > -OR,UXEMOS   	#"P=1,N=p,T=pp"    		# por->puxemos
O R > -OR,UXESTES  	#"P=2,N=p,T=pp"    		# por->puxestes
O R > -OR,UXERON   	#"P=3,N=p,T=pp"    		# por->puxeron
O R > EI		#"P=1,N=s,T=f"    		# por->porei
O R > ÁS		#"P=2,N=s,T=f"    		# por->porás
O R > Á		   	#"P=3,N=s,T=f"    		# por->porá
O R > EMOS		#"P=1,N=p,T=f"    		# por->poremos
O R > EDES	   	#"P=2,N=p,T=f"    		# por->poredes
O R > ÁN		#"P=3,N=s,T=f"    		# por->porán
O R > -OR,UÑA   	#"P=1_3,N=s,T=pi"  		# por->puña
O R > -OR,UÑAS   	#"P=2,N=s,T=pi"    		# por->puñan
O R > -OR,ÚÑAMOS  	#"P=1,N=p,T=pi"    		# por->púñamos
O R > -OR,ÚÑADES   	#"P=2,N=p,T=pi"    		# por->púñades
O R > -OR,UÑAN   	#"P=3,N=p,T=pi"    		# por->puñan
O R > -OR,UXERA		#"P=1_3,N=s,T=pmp"    		# por->puxera
O R > -OR,UXERAS	#"P=2,N=s,T=pmp"    		# por->puxeras
O R > -OR,UXÉRAMOS	#"P=1,N=p,T=pmp"    		# por->puxéramos
O R > -OR,UXÉRADES	#"P=2,N=p,T=pmp"    		# por->puxérades
O R > -OR,UXERAN	#"P=3,N=p,T=pmp"    		# por->puxeran
O R > IA		#"P=1_3,N=s,T=c"   		# por->poria
O R > IAS		#"P=2,N=s,T=c"    		# por->porias
O R > ÍAMOS		#"P=1,N=p,T=c"    		# por->poríamos
O R > ÍADES	   	#"P=2,N=p,T=c"    		# por->poríades
O R > IAN		#"P=3,N=p,T=c"    		# por->porian
O R > -R,ÑA	   	#"P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"  		# por->poña
O R > -R,ÑAS	   	#"P=2,N=s,T=ps"    		# por->poñas
O R > -R,ÑAMOS	   	#"P=1,N=p,T=ps"    		# por->poñamos
O R > -R,ÑADES	   	#"P=2,N=p,T=ps"    		# por->poñades
O R > -R,ÑAN	   	#"P=3,N=p,T=ps"    		# por->poñan
O R > -OR,UXESE		#"P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"  	  	# por->puxese
O R > -OR,UXESES	#"P=2,N=s,T=ps"  	  	# por->puxeses
O R > -OR,UXÉSEMOS	#"P=1,N=p,T=ps"  	  	# por->puxésemos
O R > -OR,UXÉSEDES	#"P=2,N=p,T=ps"  	  	# por->puxésedes
O R > -OR,UXESEN	#"P=3,N=p,T=ps"  	  	# por->puxesen
O R > -OR,UXER		#"P=1_3,N=s,T=fs"  	  	# por->puxer
O R > -OR,UXERES	#"P=1,N=s,T=fs"  	  	# por->puxeres
O R > -OR,UXERMOS	#"P=1,N=p,T=fs"  	  	# por->puxermos
O R > -OR,UXERDES	#"P=2,N=p,T=fs"  	  	# por->puxerdes
O R > -OR,UXEREN	#"P=3,N=p,T=fs"  	  	# por->puxeren
O R > ES		#"P=2,N=s,T=ic"  	  	# por->pores
O R > MOS		#"P=1,N=p,T=ic"  	  	# por->pormos
O R > DES		#"P=2,N=p,T=ic"  	  	# por->pordes
O R > EN		#"P=3,N=p,T=ic"  	  	# por->poren
O R > -R,NDO		#"T=g"				# por->pondo
O R > -R,STO		#"G=m,N=s,T=ppa"		# por->posto
O R > -R,STA		#"G=f,N=s,T=ppa"		# por->posta
O R > -R,STOS		#"G=m,N=p,T=ppa"		# por->postos
O R > -R,STAS		#"G=f,N=p,T=ppa"		# por->postas
O R > -R,NDE		#"P=2,N=p,T=i"			# por->ponde
O R > -OR,Ó	  					# supor->supó-(lo,la, etc.)

P R A C E R > -CER,Z		#"P=3,N=s,T=p"		# pracer->praz
P R A C E R > -ACER,OUVEN   	#"P=1,N=s,T=pp" 	# pracer->prouven
P R A C E R > -ACER,OUVECHE 	#"P=2,N=s,T=pp" 	# pracer->prouveche
P R A C E R > -ACER,OUVO   	#"P=3,N=s,T=pp" 	# pracer->prouvo
P R A C E R > -ACER,OUVEMOS 	#"P=1,N=p,T=pp" 	# pracer->prouvemos
P R A C E R > -ACER,OUVESTES	#"P=2,N=p,T=pp" 	# pracer->prouvestes
P R A C E R > -ACER,OUVERON 	#"P=3,N=p,T=pp"		# pracer->prouveron
P R A C E R > EI   		#"P=1,N=s,T=f" 		# pracer->pracerei
P R A C E R > ÁS   		#"P=2,N=s,T=f" 		# pracer->pracerás
P R A C E R > Á		 	#"P=3,N=s,T=f" 		# pracer->pracerá
P R A C E R > EMOS		#"P=1,N=p,T=f" 		# pracer->praceremos
P R A C E R > EDES   		#"P=2,N=p,T=f" 		# pracer->praceredes
P R A C E R > ÁN		#"P=3,N=s,T=f" 		# pracer->pracerán
P R A C E R > -ER,IA   		#"P=1_3,N=s,T=pi"	# pracer->pracia
P R A C E R > -ER,IAS   	#"P=2,N=s,T=pi"  	# pracer->pracias
P R A C E R > -ER,ÍAMOS 	#"P=1,N=p,T=pi"  	# pracer->pracíamos
P R A C E R > -ER,ÍADES 	#"P=2,N=p,T=pi"  	# pracer->pracíades
P R A C E R > -ER,IAN   	#"P=3,N=p,T=pi"  	# pracer->pracian
P R A C E R > -ACER,OUVERA	#"P=1_3,N=s,T=pmp" 	# pracer->prouvera
P R A C E R > -ACER,OUVERAS	#"P=2,N=s,T=pmp"   	# pracer->prouveras
P R A C E R > -ACER,OUVÉRAMOS 	#"P=1,N=p,T=pmp"   	# pracer->prouvéramos
P R A C E R > -ACER,OUVÉRADES 	#"P=2,N=p,T=pmp"   	# pracer->prouvérades
